South Dakota, session 2026, HB1180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 53-9:
In any governing document of a business entity, or as part of a contract for the
purchase, sale, or transfer of an ownership interest in the entity, the parties may agree
that an owner, after the transfer of the interest in the entity, may not engage, directly or
indirectly, in the same or similar type of business conducted by the entity during the
owner's period of ownership, within the specified geographic area in which the entity
conducts business, for a period not exceeding three years from the date of transfer.

26.732.22 2 1180
An Act to ensure the validity of non-compete agreements in the context of jointly owned
business entities.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1180
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1180 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1180 ENROLLED